Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1478.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2709.1(c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and subsection (f) is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 2709.1. Stalking.* * *(c) Grading.--(1) Except as otherwise provided for in [paragraph (2)] paragraphs (2) and (3), a first offense under this section shall constitute a misdemeanor of the first degree.(2) A second or subsequent offense under this section or a first offense under subsection (a) if the person has been previously convicted of a crime of violence involving the same victim, family or household member, including, but not 123456789101112131415161718 limited to, a violation of section 2701 (relating to simple assault), 2702 (relating to aggravated assault), 2705 (relating to recklessly endangering another person), 2718 (relating to strangulation), 2901 (relating to kidnapping), 3121 (relating to rape) or 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse), an order issued under section 4954 (relating to protective orders) or an order issued under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108 (relating to relief) shall constitute a felony of the third degree.(3) If the victim of an offense under this section is a minor and the perpetrator is an adult who is at least four years older than the victim, the offense shall constitute:(i) For a first offense, a felony of the second degree.(ii) For a second or subsequent offense, a felony of the first degree.* * *(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Adult." An individual 18 years of age or older.* * *"Minor." An individual under 18 years of age.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1478PN2269 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324